Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-831
Advertising on problem gambling prevention, education, and awareness messages; requirements.

The division shall spend not less than five percent of the advertising budget for the state lottery on problem gambling prevention, education, and awareness messages. The division shall collaborate with the Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling to coordinate messages developed under this section with the prevention, education, and awareness messages in use by or developed in conjunction with the Gamblers Assistance Program established pursuant to section 9-1005. For purposes of this section, the advertising budget for the state lottery includes amounts budgeted and spent for advertising, promotions, incentives, public relations, marketing, or contracts for the purchase or lease of goods or services that include advertising, promotions, incentives, public relations, or marketing, but does not include in-kind contributions by media outlets.

Laws 2006, LB 1039, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB6, § 10;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 32.
July 1, 2026